Utah statutes.
72-5-406.   Rulemaking.

In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules providing for private property owner petition procedures described in Section 72-5-405.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

